Hawaii statutes.
§150-29 Seed licenses. A seed license
from the department is required of:

(1) Every person whose name and address are required
on the label or who imports into the State for sale or resale, agricultural or
vegetable seed for planting purposes.

(2) Every person who opens any bag or container of
agricultural or vegetable seed and sells the contents for planting purposes
within the State.

Application for the license shall be made to the
department in accordance with rules adopted by the department. All licenses
shall expire on June 30 of each year. [L 1945, c 90, pt of §2; RL 1955,
§26-13; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §150-29; am L
1979, c 87, §4; am L 1987, c 164, §11; am L 1991, c 73, §8]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next